Wisconsin, session 2025, SB593.
do enact as follows:SB593,11Section 1. 601.83 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB593,2,152601.83 (1) (a) The commissioner shall administer a state-based reinsurance 3program known as the healthcare stability plan in accordance with the specific 4terms and conditions approved by the federal department of health and human 5services dated July 29, 2018. Before December 31, 2023, the The commissioner may 6not request from the federal department of health and human services a 7modification, suspension, withdrawal, or termination of the waiver under 42 USC 818052 under which the healthcare stability plan under this subchapter operates 9unless legislation has been enacted specifically directing the modification, 10suspension, withdrawal, or termination. Before December 31, 2023, the The 11commissioner may request renewal, without substantive change, of the waiver 12under 42 USC 18052 under which the health care stability plan operates in 13accordance with s. 20.940 (4) unless legislation has been enacted that is contrary to 14such a renewal request. The commissioner shall comply with applicable timing in 15and requirements of s. 20.940.SB593,216Section 2. 628.095 (3) and (5) of the statutes are amended to read:SB593,3,817628.095 (3) Required when annual fee paid. At the time that the annual 1fee is paid under s. 601.31 (1) (m), (nm) 2., or (np) 2., an intermediary or navigator 2who is a natural person, or an individual navigator, shall provide his or her social 3security number unless the intermediary or navigator he or she does not have a 4social security number, and an intermediary or navigator that is not a natural 5person, or a navigator entity, shall provide its federal employer identification 6number, if the social security number or federal employer identification number 7was not provided on the application for the license or registration or previously 8when the annual fee was paid.SB593,3,219(5) If applicant or intermediary or navigator natural person has no 10social security number. If an An applicant who is a natural person and who does 11not have a social security number, the applicant shall provide to the commissioner, 12along with the application for a license and on a form prescribed by the department 13of children and families, a statement made or subscribed under oath or affirmation 14that the applicant does not have a social security number. If an An intermediary or 15navigator who is a natural person and who does not have a social security number, 16the intermediary or an individual navigator who does not have a social security 17number, shall provide to the commissioner, each time that the annual fee is paid 18under s. 601.31 (1) (m) or (nm) 2. and on a form prescribed by the department of 19children and families, a statement made or subscribed under oath or affirmation 20that the intermediary or individual navigator does not have a social security 21number.SB593,322Section 3. 628.10 (2), (3) and (5) (a) and (b) of the statutes are amended to 23read:SB593,4,1024628.10 (2) Revocation, suspension, and limitation of licenses. (a) For 1failure to comply with continuing education or annual training requirements. The 2license of any intermediary or individual navigator who fails to produce evidence of 3compliance with continuing education standards set by the commissioner or with 4annual training requirements is revoked, effective on the date on which the 5evidence of compliance is due. At least 60 days before that date, the commissioner 6shall notify the intermediary or individual navigator of the date by which the 7evidence of compliance is due and that the intermediary’s or navigator’s license will 8be revoked if the evidence is not received by that date. An intermediary or 9individual navigator whose license is revoked under this paragraph may have his or 10her license reinstated, or may be relicensed, as provided in sub. (5).SB593,4,1811(am) Nonpayment of fees. The license of an intermediary or individual 12navigator who fails to pay a fee when due is revoked, effective on the date on which 13the fee is due. At least 60 days before that date, the commissioner shall notify the 14intermediary or individual navigator of the date by which the fee is due and that the 15intermediary’s or navigator’s license will be revoked if timely payment is not made. 16An intermediary who is a natural person, or an individual navigator, whose license 17is revoked under this paragraph may have his or her license reinstated, or may be 18relicensed, as provided in sub. (5).SB593,5,619(b) For other reasons. Except as provided in pars. (c) to (d), after a hearing, the 20commissioner may revoke, suspend, or limit in whole or in part the license of any 21intermediary or individual navigator if the commissioner finds that the licensee is 22unqualified as an intermediary or individual navigator, is not competent or 23trustworthy under s. 628.04 (1) (b) 2., or has repeatedly or knowingly violated an 24insurance statute or rule or a valid order of the commissioner under s. 601.41 (4), or 1if the intermediary’s or individual navigator’s methods and practices in the conduct 2of business endanger, or financial resources are inadequate to safeguard, the 3legitimate interests of customers and the public. Nothing in this paragraph limits 4the authority of the commissioner to suspend summarily an intermediary’s or 5individual navigator’s the license of an intermediary or individual navigator under 6s. 227.51 (3).SB593,5,237(c) For failure to pay support or to comply with subpoena or warrant. The 8commissioner shall suspend or limit the license, including a temporary license 9under s. 628.09, of an intermediary who is a natural person, the license of or an 10individual navigator, or a temporary license of a natural person under s. 628.09, if 11the natural person who is delinquent in court-ordered payments of child or family 12support, maintenance, birth expenses, medical expenses, or other expenses related 13to the support of a child or former spouse, or if the natural person who fails to 14comply, after appropriate notice, with a subpoena or warrant issued by the 15department of children and families or a county child support agency under s. 59.53 16(5) and related to paternity or child support proceedings, as provided in a 17memorandum of understanding entered into under s. 49.857. A natural person 18whose license or temporary license is suspended under this paragraph An 19intermediary or individual navigator who satisfies the requirements under this 20paragraph for which the license or temporary license was suspended may have his 21or her license or temporary license reinstated by satisfactorily completing a 22reinstatement application and paying the application fee for original licensure as 23specified by rule.SB593,6,924(cm) For liability for delinquent taxes or unemployment insurance 1contributions. The commissioner shall revoke the license, including a temporary 2license under s. 628.09, of an intermediary or individual navigator, including a 3temporary license under s. 628.09, if the department of revenue certifies under s. 473.0301 that the intermediary or individual navigator is liable for delinquent taxes 5or if the department of workforce development certifies under s. 108.227 that the 6intermediary or individual navigator is liable for delinquent unemployment 7insurance contributions. An intermediary who is a natural person, or an individual 8navigator, whose license is revoked under this paragraph may have his or her 9license reinstated, or may be relicensed, as provided in sub. (5).SB593,6,1610(cr) For providing false information in statement. The commissioner shall 11revoke the license, including a temporary license under s. 628.09, of an 12intermediary or individual navigator, including a temporary license under s. 13628.09, if the commissioner determines, after a hearing, that the intermediary or 14individual navigator provided false information in a any statement provided under 15s. 628.095 (5) with the intermediary’s or navigator’s application or at the time that 16the annual fee was paid under s. 601.31 (1) (m) or (nm) 2.SB593,7,517(d) For failure to provide social security number, federal employer 18identification number or statement. If an intermediary or individual navigator fails 19to provide a social security number or federal employer identification number as 20required under s. 628.095 (3) or a statement as required under s. 628.095 (5), the 21commissioner shall suspend or limit the license of the intermediary or individual 22navigator, effective the day following the last day on which the annual fee under s. 23601.31 (1) (m) or (nm) 2. may be paid, if the commissioner has given the 24intermediary or individual navigator reasonable notice of when the fee must be 1paid to avoid suspension or limitation. If the intermediary or individual navigator 2provides the social security number, federal employer identification number, or 3statement within 60 days from the effective date of the suspension, the 4commissioner shall reinstate the intermediary’s or navigator’s license effective as of 5the date of suspension.SB593,7,106(e) For changing state of residence. The license of an intermediary or 7individual navigator who changes residence from one state to another is revoked 60 8days after the change of residence. The intermediary or individual navigator may 9be relicensed only after satisfying any requirements under s. 628.04 or 628.92 that 10are specified by the commissioner by rule.SB593,7,1511(3) Delay for new application. An order revoking an intermediary’s or 12individual navigator’s a license under sub. (2) (b) or (cr) may specify a time not to 13exceed 5 years within which the former intermediary or individual navigator may 14not apply for a new license. If no time is specified, the intermediary or individual 15navigator may not apply for 5 years.SB593,8,616(5) (a) Reinstatement within 12 months. An intermediary who is a natural 17person, or an individual navigator, whose license is revoked under sub. (2) (a), (am), 18or (cm) may have his or her license reinstated within 12 months after the date on 19which the license was revoked without having to satisfy any prelicensing education 20or examination requirements under s. 628.04 or any prelicensing training or 21examination requirements under s. 628.92 (7). To have his or her license 22reinstated, the intermediary or individual navigator must satisfy the requirement 23under sub. (2) (a), (am), or (cm) for which the license was revoked, satisfactorily 24complete a reinstatement application, and pay twice the amount of the applicable 1license renewal fee. The reinstatement is effective on the date on which the 2commissioner actually reinstates the license. If the An intermediary or individual 3navigator who is also a resident and who is required to complete continuing 4education or annual training, the intermediary or navigator must have satisfied all 5previous continuing education or annual training requirements to have his or her 6license reinstated under this paragraph.SB593,8,137(b) Relicensing required after 12 months. An intermediary or individual 8navigator specified in par. (a) whose license has been revoked for more than 12 9months is not eligible to have his or her license reinstated under par. (a) but may 10apply for relicensing at any time after 12 months have elapsed from the date of 11revocation. To be relicensed, the intermediary or individual navigator must satisfy 12any requirements under s. 628.04 or 628.92 that are specified by the commissioner 13by rule.SB593,414Section 4. 628.90 (3) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is renumbered 628.90 (3) 15(intro.) and amended to read:SB593,8,1916628.90 (3) (intro.) Except as provided in par. (b), “navigator” “Individual 17navigator” means a natural person, or an entity that supervises or employs 18including a natural person who is supervised or employed by an entity, who does all 19of the following:SB593,520Section 5. 628.90 (3) (b) of the statutes is repealed.SB593,621Section 6. 628.90 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:SB593,8,2322628.90 (3m) “Navigator entity” means an entity or organization that does all 23of the following:SB593,8,2424(a) Employs, supervises, or is affiliated with at least one individual navigator.SB593,9,21(b) Performs, and receives funding to perform, any of the activities and duties 2identified in 42 USC 18031 (i) and 45 CFR 155.210 on behalf of the exchange.SB593,73Section 7. 628.91 of the statutes is amended to read:SB593,9,74628.91 Requirement of licensure or registration. No natural person or 5entity, including an intermediary licensed under subch. II, may act as a navigator 6in this state as an individual navigator unless licensed under s. 628.92 (1) or as a 7navigator entity unless registered as a navigator under s. 628.92 (2).SB593,88Section 8. 628.92 (1) (intro.) and (d), (2) (intro.), (a) and (b), (6) and (7) of the 9statutes are amended to read:SB593,9,1610628.92 (1) Individual navigator license. (intro.) A natural person 11applying for a an individual navigator license shall make application apply to the 12commissioner on a form developed by the commissioner and shall declare under 13penalty of refusal, suspension, or revocation of the license that the statements made 14in the application are true, correct, and complete to the best of the individual’s 15applicant’s knowledge and belief. Before approving the application, the 16commissioner shall find that the person applicant satisfies all of the following:SB593,9,2017(d) Has successfully passed a written examination approved by the 18commissioner under sub. (7) that tests the applicant’s knowledge concerning the 19duties and responsibilities of a an individual navigator, the insurance laws and 20regulations of this state, and state public assistance programs and eligibility.SB593,9,2421(2) Entity registration. (intro.) An entity that acts or intends to operate as 22a navigator, supervises the activities of individual navigators, or receives funding to 23perform such activities entity shall first register as a navigator entity with the 24commissioner. This registration shall be on an application form developed by the 1commissioner, which shall include such documentation as the commissioner 2determines is necessary and appropriate. Before the commissioner may register 3the entity as a navigator entity, the entity must shall establish to the satisfaction of 4the commissioner that it satisfies all of the following:SB593,10,85(a) The entity has policies and procedures in place to ensure that all acts that 6may be performed only by a an individual navigator or licensed intermediary are 7performed by persons who are appropriately licensed under this subchapter or 8subch. II, or both.SB593,10,129(b) The entity will assume full legal responsibility for the acts of the 10individual navigators that it employs, supervises, or is affiliated with that are 11performed in this state and that are within the scope of the individual navigator’s 12apparent authority.SB593,10,2013(6) Fingerprints and criminal and regulatory background check for 14licensure as individual navigator. Each applicant natural person who applies 15under sub. (1) for licensure as an individual navigator shall provide fingerprints in 16a format specified by the commissioner and complete a criminal and regulatory 17background check as a condition for being granted a the license to act as a 18navigator. The commissioner shall use the fingerprints to conduct a state criminal 19history background investigation of the applicant and a national criminal history 20background investigation of the applicant with the federal bureau of investigation.SB593,11,721(7) Training and examination. An individual navigator shall complete at 22least 16 hours of prelicensing training and satisfactorily complete an approved 23written examination for navigators before applying for an individual navigator’s a 24license under sub. (1). After licensure, an individual navigator shall complete a 1course of study of at least 8 hours of approved training every one-year period. The 2commissioner may approve and designate courses and programs that an applicant 3for a navigator’s license may complete to fulfill the prelicensing training 4requirement or that a licensed navigator licensee may complete to fulfill the annual 5training requirement. The commissioner may make arrangements, including 6contracting with an outside testing service or other appropriate entity, to 7administer examinations and collect fees.SB593,98Section 9. 628.95 (title), (1) and (2) (intro.) and (c) of the statutes are 9amended to read:SB593,11,1410628.95 (title) Navigator Individual navigator, navigator entity, and 11nonnavigator assister conduct. (1) General. For purposes of this subchapter, 12a an individual navigator, navigator entity, or nonnavigator assister, in the 13performance of its duties, shall be considered to be transacting the business of 14insurance.SB593,11,1615(2) Prohibited practices. (intro.) A An individual navigator, navigator 16entity, or nonnavigator assister may not do any of the following:SB593,11,2117(c) Make or cause to be made any communication relating to the exchange, 18health benefit plans, an insurance contract, the insurance business, any insurer, 19any individual navigator, any navigator entity, any nonnavigator assister, or any 20intermediary that contains false, deceptive, or misleading information, including 21information that is misleading because of incompleteness.SB593,11,2222